Massachusetts, session 194th, S1881.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 8 of Chapter 32A of the General Laws shall be amended by inserting the
following after the last line of the first paragraph: “Said funds appropriated by the legislature
along with the contributions made by the active and retired employees shall be deposited into the
group commission trust fund to provide the required coverages offered by the commission.”
of 1